packages/spell_kit/test/fixtures/basic/index.aff
# SPDX-FileCopyrightText: 2026 Benoit Rolandeau <borlnov.obsessio@gmail.com>
#
# SPDX-License-Identifier: Apache-2.0

# Fixture affix file for spell_kit tests: single-character flags (the default width). Covers a
# suffix rule, a prefix rule, their cross product (direct dictionary flags on the stem), a
# continuation class (a flag satisfied through another rule rather than the stem's own flags),
# NEEDAFFIX and FORBIDDENWORD. No BREAK directive is declared here, so the hunspell default
# (-, ^-, -$) must apply — see test/fixtures/break_explicit for the explicit form.
SET UTF-8
TRY aehnoprstuw

FORBIDDENWORD !
NEEDAFFIX ~

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un .

SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 s .

PFX R Y 1
PFX R 0 re .

SFX X Y 1
SFX X 0 0/R .
